Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-4829
Amending or revoking anatomical gift
before donor's death.

(a) Subject to section 71-4831, a donor or other person
authorized to make an anatomical gift under section 71-4827 may amend or revoke
an anatomical gift by:

(1)
A record signed by:

(A) The donor;

(B) The other person;
or

(C) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, another individual
acting at the direction of the donor or the other person if the donor or other
person is physically unable to sign; or

(2) A later-executed document of gift that
amends or revokes a previous anatomical gift or portion of an anatomical gift,
either expressly or by inconsistency.

(b) A record signed pursuant to subdivision
(a)(1)(C) of this section must:

(1) Be witnessed by at least two adults,
at least one of whom is a disinterested witness, who have signed at the request
of the donor or the other person; and

(2) State that it has been signed and witnessed
as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

(c) Subject to
section 71-4831, a donor or other person authorized to make an anatomical
gift under section 71-4827 may revoke an anatomical gift by the destruction
or cancellation of the document of gift, or the portion of the document of
gift used to make the gift, with the intent to revoke the gift.

(d)
A donor may amend or revoke an anatomical gift that was not made in a will
by any form of communication during a terminal illness or injury addressed
to at least two adults, at least one of whom is a disinterested witness.

(e)
A donor who makes an anatomical gift in a will may amend or revoke the gift
in the manner provided for amendment or revocation of wills or as provided
in subsection (a) of this section.

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 6.